el: Τύπος συνδέσμου ηλεκτρικού σκούτερ: Anderson Powerpole; Bullet 3,5 mm; Bullet 4 mm; Bullet 5,5 mm; Βύσμα DC (barrel) 5,5 x 2,1 mm; Βύσμα DC (barrel) 5,5 x 2,5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Ακροδέκτης τύπου δακτυλίου; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Ακροδέκτης τύπου δίχαλου (spade); XT30; XT60; XT90; Άλλο
th: ประเภทขั้วต่อสกูตเตอร์ไฟฟ้า: Anderson Powerpole; หัวกระสุน 3.5 มม.; หัวกระสุน 4 มม.; หัวกระสุน 5.5 มม.; DC Barrel 5.5 x 2.1 มม.; DC Barrel 5.5 x 2.5 มม.; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; หางปลาแบบกลม; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; หางปลาแบบแฉก; XT30; XT60; XT90; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ złącza hulajnogi elektrycznej: Anderson Powerpole; Złącze cylindryczne 3,5 mm (Bullet); Złącze cylindryczne 4 mm (Bullet); Złącze cylindryczne 5,5 mm (Bullet); Wtyk DC 5,5 x 2,1 mm; Wtyk DC 5,5 x 2,5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Złącze oczkowe; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Złącze widełkowe; XT30; XT60; XT90; Inne
ja: 電動スクーターコネクタータイプ: Anderson Powerpole; バレット 3.5 mm; バレット 4 mm; バレット 5.5 mm; DCバレル 5.5 x 2.1 mm; DCバレル 5.5 x 2.5 mm; F1ファストン; F2ファストン; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; 丸型端子; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; クワ型端子; XT30; XT60; XT90; その他
es: Tipo de conector para patinete eléctrico: Anderson Powerpole; Tipo bala 3,5 mm; Tipo bala 4 mm; Tipo bala 5,5 mm; Cilíndrico de CC 5,5 x 2,1 mm; Cilíndrico de CC 5,5 x 2,5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Terminal de anillo; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Terminal de espada; XT30; XT60; XT90; Otro
sl-SI: Vrsta povezovalnika električnega skuterja: Anderson Powerpole; Kroglasti 3,5 mm (bullet); Kroglasti 4 mm (bullet); Kroglasti 5,5 mm (bullet); DC sodček 5,5 x 2,1 mm; DC sodček 5,5 x 2,5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Obročasti priključek; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Viličasti priključek; XT30; XT60; XT90; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de conector para trotinete elétrica: Anderson Powerpole; Ficha bala de 3,5 mm; Ficha bala de 4 mm; Ficha bala de 5,5 mm; Ficha cilíndrica DC 5,5 x 2,1 mm; Ficha cilíndrica DC 5,5 x 2,5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Terminal em anel; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Terminal em forquilha; XT30; XT60; XT90; Outro
da: Stiktype til el-løbehjul: Anderson Powerpole; Rundstik 3,5 mm; Rundstik 4 mm; Rundstik 5,5 mm; DC-stik 5,5 x 2,1 mm; DC-stik 5,5 x 2,5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Ringkabelsko; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Spadekabelsko; XT30; XT60; XT90; Andet
en: E-scooter connector type: Anderson Powerpole; Bullet 3.5 mm; Bullet 4 mm; Bullet 5.5 mm; DC barrel 5.5 x 2.1 mm; DC barrel 5.5 x 2.5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Ring terminal; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Spade terminal; XT30; XT60; XT90; Other
cs: Typ konektoru elektrokoloběžky: Anderson Powerpole; Bullet 3,5 mm; Bullet 4 mm; Bullet 5,5 mm; DC konektor 5,5 × 2,1 mm; DC konektor 5,5 × 2,5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Kabelové očko; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Nožový konektor; XT30; XT60; XT90; Ostatní
hr-HR: Vrsta konektora za električni skuter: Anderson Powerpole; Metak 3,5 mm; Metak 4 mm; Metak 5,5 mm; DC bačvasti 5,5 x 2,1 mm; DC bačvasti 5,5 x 2,5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Prstenasta stopica; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Viličasta stopica; XT30; XT60; XT90; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de conector para patinete elétrico: Anderson Powerpole; Bala de 3,5 mm; Bala de 4 mm; Bala de 5,5 mm; Barril DC de 5,5 x 2,1 mm; Barril DC de 5,5 x 2,5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Terminal olhal; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Terminal forquilha; XT30; XT60; XT90; Outro
sv: Anslutningstyp för elscooter: Anderson Powerpole; Bullet 3,5 mm; Bullet 4 mm; Bullet 5,5 mm; DC-plugg 5,5 x 2,1 mm; DC-plugg 5,5 x 2,5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Ringkabelsko; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Spadkabelsko; XT30; XT60; XT90; Övrigt
fi: Sähköpotkulaudan liitintyyppi: Anderson Powerpole; Pyöröliitin 3,5 mm; Pyöröliitin 4 mm; Pyöröliitin 5,5 mm; DC-liitin 5,5 x 2,1 mm; DC-liitin 5,5 x 2,5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Rengasliitin; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Lattaliitin; XT30; XT60; XT90; Muu
ko: 전동 스쿠터 커넥터 유형: Anderson Powerpole; 총알 단자 3.5mm; 총알 단자 4mm; 총알 단자 5.5mm; DC 배럴 5.5 x 2.1mm; DC 배럴 5.5 x 2.5mm; F1 패스턴; F2 패스턴; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; 링 터미널; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; 스페이드 터미널; XT30; XT60; XT90; 기타
bg-BG: Тип конектор за електрически скутер: Anderson Powerpole; Bullet 3,5 мм; Bullet 4 мм; Bullet 5,5 мм; DC конектор 5,5 x 2,1 мм; DC конектор 5,5 x 2,5 мм; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Пръстеновиден накрайник; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Плосък накрайник; XT30; XT60; XT90; Друго
it: tipo di connettore per monopattino elettrico: Anderson Powerpole; Bullet 3,5 mm; A proiettile 4 mm; Bullet 5,5 mm; Connettore a barilotto CC 5,5 x 2,1 mm; Connettore a barilotto CC 5,5 x 2,5 mm; Faston F1; Faston F2; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Terminale ad anello; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Terminale a forcella; XT30; XT60; XT90; Altro
zh-TW: 電動滑板車接頭類型: 安德森 (Anderson) Powerpole 接口; 子彈頭 3.5 公釐; 子彈頭 4 公釐; 子彈頭 5.5 公釐; DC 直流圓口 5.5 x 2.1 公釐; DC 直流圓口 5.5 x 2.5 公釐; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; O 型端子; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Y 型端子; XT30; XT60; XT90; 其他
hu: E-robogó csatlakozó típusa: Anderson Powerpole; 3,5 mm-es bullet (golyós) csatlakozó; 4 mm-es bullet (golyós) csatlakozó; 5,5 mm-es bullet (golyós) csatlakozó; DC hordócsatlakozó (5,5 x 2,1 mm); DC hordócsatlakozó (5,5 x 2,5 mm); F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Gyűrűs saru; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Villás saru; XT30; XT60; XT90; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ konektora pre e-kolobežku: Anderson Powerpole; Bullet 3,5 mm; Bullet 4 mm; Bullet 5,5 mm; Valcový DC konektor 5,5 x 2,1 mm; Valcový DC konektor 5,5 x 2,5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Očková koncovka; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Vidlicová koncovka; XT30; XT60; XT90; Iné
de: Typ des E-Scooter-Anschlusses: Anderson Powerpole; Rundsteckverbinder 3,5 mm; Rundsteckverbinder 4 mm; Rundsteckverbinder 5,5 mm; Hohlstecker 5,5 x 2,1 mm; Hohlstecker 5,5 x 2,5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Ringkabelschuh; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Flachsteckhülse; XT30; XT60; XT90; Sonstige
fr: Type de connecteur de trottinette électrique: Anderson Powerpole; Bullet 3,5 mm; Bullet 4 mm; Bullet 5,5 mm; Fiche cylindrique CC 5,5 x 2,1 mm; Fiche cylindrique CC 5,5 x 2,5 mm; Faston F1; Faston F2; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Cosse à anneau; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Cosse à fourche; XT30; XT60; XT90; Autre
nb: El-sparkesykkel koblingstype: Anderson Powerpole; Kuleplugg 3,5 mm; Kuleplugg 4 mm; Kuleplugg 5,5 mm; DC-plugg 5,5 x 2,1 mm; DC-plugg 5,5 x 2,5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Ringkabelsko; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Spadekabelsko; XT30; XT60; XT90; Annet
zh-CN: 电动滑板车连接器类型: Anderson Powerpole; 子弹头 3.5 毫米; 子弹头 4 毫米; 子弹头 5.5 毫米; DC 圆柱接头 5.5 x 2.1 毫米; DC 圆柱接头 5.5 x 2.5 毫米; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; 环形端子; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; 铲形端子; XT30; XT60; XT90; 其他
tr: E-scooter bağlantı konnektörü türü: Anderson Powerpole; Bullet 3,5 mm; Bullet 4 mm; Bullet 5,5 mm; DC jak 5,5 x 2,1 mm; DC jak 5,5 x 2,5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Halka terminal; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Çatal terminal; XT30; XT60; XT90; Diğer
ro-RO: Tip conector trotinetă electrică: Anderson Powerpole; Bullet 3,5 mm; Bullet 4 mm; Bullet 5,5 mm; Cilindric DC 5,5 x 2,1 mm; Cilindric DC 5,5 x 2,5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Papuc inelar; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Papuc furcă; XT30; XT60; XT90; Altele
lt-LT: Elektrinio paspirtuko jungties tipas: Anderson Powerpole; Cilindrinė 3,5 mm; Cilindrinė 4 mm; Cilindrinė 5,5 mm; DC cilindrinė 5,5 x 2,1 mm; DC cilindrinė 5,5 x 2,5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Žiedinis antgalis; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Plokščiasis antgalis; XT30; XT60; XT90; Kita
nl: E-scooter connector type: Anderson Powerpole; Bullet 3,5 mm; Bullet 4 mm; Bullet 5,5 mm; DC barrel 5,5 x 2,1 mm; DC barrel 5,5 x 2,5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Ringaansluiting; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Spade-aansluiting; XT30; XT60; XT90; Anders
vi: Loại đầu nối xe tay ga điện: Anderson Powerpole; Giắc cắm đạn (bullet) 3,5 mm; Giắc cắm đạn (bullet) 4 mm; Giắc cắm đạn (bullet) 5,5 mm; Đầu cắm tròn (barrel) DC 5,5 x 2,1 mm; Đầu cắm tròn (barrel) DC 5,5 x 2,5 mm; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Đầu cốt vòng; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Đầu cốt chẻ; XT30; XT60; XT90; Khác
ru: Тип разъема электросамоката: Anderson Powerpole; Штекерный (bullet) 3,5 мм; Штекерный (bullet) 4 мм; Штекерный (bullet) 5,5 мм; Штекер DC 5,5 х 2,1 мм; Штекер DC 5,5 х 2,5 мм; F1 Faston; F2 Faston; JST-PH; JST-SM; Molex Micro-Fit; Кольцевая клемма; SAE; SMH SB120; SMH SB50; Вилочная клемма; XT30; XT60; XT90; Другое